District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Opening Worker-Ownership: A New Economic Resilience Strategy
(OWNERS) Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Consumer Protection Procedures Act (D.C. Law 1-76; D.C.
Official Code § 28–3902) is amended by inserting a new section (3A) to read as follows:
“Sec. 3A. Potential Business Closures Survey and Worker Cooperative Report
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Alternative ownership model” means private or corporate ownership that
significantly shifts economic value and decision-making power toward non-investor
stakeholders, including workers, producers, consumers, and community members;
“(2) “Asset opportunity” means an LLC registered in DC, often associated with
ownership of a single property address, that has a property where either 1) a commercial or
residential unit has been vacant or without construction permits for over a year, 2) the property is

behind on its property taxes, or 3) consistently has an fines levied on it by DLCP, DOH, DPW,
DOB, or other relevant city agencies (even if those fines are paid or contested);
“(3) “Coalition” means a diverse and multi-stakeholder of interests with
representation from local organizations and a group of at least 5 local residents;
“(4) “Collaborative grant” means a grant issued jointly to a Coalition or jointly to
three signer organizations
“(5) “Communicate and Follow-up” means use a combination of communication
methods to inform of events or opportunities at least 3 days ahead of the relevant moment,
including text, call/voicemail, mail, and flyers posted on poles in a relevant area;
“(6) “Community-ownership” means a project, wealth-building asset, coalition, or
business that is majority-controlled and majority-owned by its employees, residents, or an
equitable multi-stakeholder governance structure;
“(7) “Demonstrated community need” means a coverage gap of disproportionate
distance for critical community need, including grocery stores, farmers markers, or other points
of access to fresh food; childcare and senior care; and parks, libraries, or other low-barrier
gathering places.
“(8) “Informal trusted leader” means a hyper-local leader who is perceived to be a
trusted messenger in their immediate (<.5 mile) community, including pastors, volunteer cleanup
organizers, peace-advocates, candy ladies who take care of and feed youth in the community,
neighbors who flyer, text, or otherwise share information.
“(9) “Local economic infrastructure” means legal structures and entities to build
and facilitate technical, legal, social, and financial wealth of low-wealth DC residents, including
land banks, community-owned and mutual insurance, mutual credit cleaning, labor market apps


or websites for DC residents to post skills and employers to share gigs with a focus on in-
demand labor categories, investment marketplaces as a public service or community-owned
utility.
“(10) “Local entity” means an organization operating in the District in which
either 75% or more of its ownership, controlling interest, and membership are District residents
or the owners or members have consent or letters of support from at least 5 informal trusted
leaders;
“(11) “Potential business closure” means a business or asset where the ownership
or management of that business might be getting ready to retire, close or want to sell due to
insolvency, or had its rent recently increased by more than 10%;
“(12) “Worker cooperative conversion” means a business deal between the
owners of a business and the employees of that business where ownership sells the business to a
democratically-controlled entity owned by the employees, a Limited Cooperative Association, a
General Cooperative Association, or converts to at least 51% employee-control through a local
nonprofit developer, CDFI, or purpose trust that is worker-owned and democratically-controlled
provided they provide startup and ongoing technical and legal assistance;
“(b) By November 1, 2025, the Department shall conduct and release the results of a
survey of business owners, local entities undergoing worker cooperative conversions, and
employees. The survey shall seek to ascertain:
“(1) What business owners are interested in retirement, closing businesses, or
selling/buying businesses, and why;
“(2) What opportunities exist for the Department and other District agencies to
support worker cooperative conversions;


“(3) A list of asset opportunities and potential business closures that could
strengthen the economy if they were to go through worker cooperative conversions or be
converted to community-ownership, as well as a framework for regularly updating the list; and
“(4) A list of existing limited cooperative associations.
“(c) By March 1, 2026, the Department shall product a report detailing:
“(1) Policy recommendations that reflect input from at least 5 community
members, including at least 3 that focus on low-income and low-wealth workers from
historically marginalized, low-wealth, and under-invested communities;
“(2) The Department and other District agencies’ existing capacity for deal-
making, financing, and organizational policy;
“(3) The Department and the District’s strategy for engaging with the United
States Department of Labor's employee ownership office, qualified community members, local
legal foundations and organizations that could mobilize technical and legal capacity for business
deals, and regional experts on program development internal to the city/Department for worker
cooperative conversions; and
“(4) A long-term strategy for developing a robust cooperative and community
wealth building infrastructure in the District, including:
“(A) How the Department can help identify potential business closures or
asset opportunities that are good candidates for worker cooperative conversions and how to
notify and educate businesses about worker cooperative conversions, ideally during their
licensing and registration processes or tax-paying processes
100 “(B) How the Department and other agencies can make it easier, cheaper,
101 and less bureaucratic for coalitions to secure financing and buy asset opportunities, including


102 alternative ownership governance frameworks and new entities or simplified licensing
103 categories;
104 “(C) How the Department and other agencies can use collaborative grants
105 to support economic infrastructure or nonprofit purpose trusts;
106 “(D) Potential policy frameworks to support coalitions, community wealth
107 building, and alternative ownership models, such as a tax credit for worker cooperative
108 conversion feasibility studies, a tax credit for the transaction costs of a worker cooperative
109 conversion, expanded collateral guarantee programs to cover worker cooperative conversions,
110 government-provided bank accounts, land banks, community-owned insurance, revolving loan
111 funds, and mutual credit clearing;
112 “(E) How the District can expand worker cooperatives in high-demand
113 trades and skills with demonstrated First Source local labor shortages;
114 “(F) Ongoing back-office, accounting, insurance, payroll, technical
115 assistance, feasibility studying, and/or legal supports and systems needed for business-owners
116 looking to sell to their employees or communities and for the employees to be prepared to take
117 over the business and participate in workplace democracy;
118 “(G) Options for a process for the city to provide these ongoing supports
119 for Worker Cooperative Conversions, including letting intermediaries steward the process or act
120 as holding companies, provided that the intermediaries provide financial and technical assistance
121 and the deal converts to majority worker-ownership and worker-control within 10 years; and
122 “(H) Options for matching or investing in a fund for worker organizing
123 and technical assistance.
124 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


125 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
126 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
127 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
128 Sec. 4. Effective date.
129 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
130 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
131 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
132 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
133 Columbia Register.